Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7393.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
(1) Access to affordable, high-quality childcare is essential to support labor force
participation of parents with children from infancy through age twelve (12) years and to maximize
the economic productivity of the state.
(2) Access to affordable, high-quality childcare is essential for all parents to achieve
economic security and independence, particularly for mothers who often have lower lifetime
earnings because they earn lower wages, work reduced hours, and take longer breaks from work in
order to care for children.
(3) High-quality childcare programs, staffed by qualified and effective educators, are
essential for children to promote healthy development and optimize learning during early childhood
and school-age years.
(4) A landmark report by the Institute of Medicine and National Research Council found
that children begin learning at birth and the adults that provide for the care and education of children
bear a great responsibility for their health, development, and learning -- setting the critical
foundation for lifelong progress. The report recommends that states work to increase the
qualifications and compensation of childcare educators, including those who care for infants and
toddlers.
(5) Childcare educators are among the lowest paid workers in Rhode Island. In 2024, the
median wage of a childcare educator in Rhode Island was sixteen dollars and seventy-four cents

($16.74) per hour.
(6) The U.S. Department of Health and Human Services provides significant funding to
Rhode Island through the Child Care and Development Block Grant and has established clear
guidelines for setting rates that provide low-income families with "equal access" to the childcare
market as required under federal law. The "equal access" guideline is to pay rates equal to or above
the seventy-fifth percentile of a recent market rate survey.
(7) The Rhode Island Governor’s Workforce Board recommends that Rhode Island pay
childcare rates that meet or exceed the equal access standard as a first step to support program
quality and to improved wages and retention of child care educators. As of 2025, there were twenty
(20) states that met or exceeded the equal access standard, including Massachusetts, New
Hampshire, New York and Vermont.
(8) The U.S. Department of Health and Human Services has also established a clear
guideline for determining whether childcare is affordable. Currently, the federal guideline for
affordability is that families should pay no more than seven percent (7%) of family income for
childcare. Using that guideline, almost all families with young children in the State of Rhode Island
need a subsidy to afford the cost of high-quality childcare staffed by qualified, effective, and fairly-
compensated educators.
(9) The Federal Child Care and Development Block Grant focuses on helping lower income
families access childcare, limiting the use of federal funds to families with incomes at or below
eighty-five percent (85%) of the state median income and allows states to waive this limit for
children who are members of a protected population such as children in foster care. As of 2025,
there were fifteen (15) states that set family income eligibility limits at or above eighty-five percent
(85%) of state median income, including Maine, New York and Vermont.
SECTION 2. Title 40 of the General Laws entitled "HUMAN SERVICES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 6.7
RHODE ISLAND CHILDCARE IS ESSENTIAL ACT
40-6.7-1. Childcare assistance -- Families or assistance units eligible.
(a) The department of human services shall provide appropriate childcare to every
participant who is eligible for cash assistance and who requires childcare in order to meet the work
requirements in accordance with this chapter.
(b) Low-income childcare. The department shall provide childcare to all other families with
incomes at or below eighty-five percent (85%) of the state median income, the low-income family
eligibility benchmark in the federal Childcare and Development Block Grant if, and to the extent,
LC004394 - Page 2 of 13

these other families require childcare in order to work at paid employment and/or to participate in
training, apprenticeship, internship, on-the-job training, work experience, work immersion, or other
job-readiness/job-attachment programs sponsored or funded by the governor's workforce board
Rhode Island established pursuant to the provisions of chapter 102 of title 42 or state agencies that
are part of the coordinated program system pursuant to § 42-102-11. The department shall also
provide childcare assistance to families with incomes below eighty-five percent (85%) of the state
median income when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or
maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education.
(c) No family or assistance unit shall be eligible for childcare assistance under this chapter
if the combined value of its liquid resources exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), which
corresponds to the amount permitted by the federal government under the state plan and set forth
in the administrative rulemaking process by the department. As used in this section "liquid
resources" means any interest(s) in property in the form of cash or other financial instruments or
accounts that are readily convertible to cash or cash equivalents. These resources include, but are
not limited to: cash, bank, credit union, or other financial institution savings, checking, and money
market accounts; certificates of deposit or other time deposits; stocks; bonds; mutual funds; and
other similar financial instruments or accounts. These resources do not include educational savings
accounts, plans, or programs; retirement accounts, plans, or programs; or accounts held jointly with
another adult, not including a spouse. The department is authorized to promulgate rules and
regulations to determine the ownership and source of the funds in the joint account.
(d) As a condition of eligibility for childcare assistance under this chapter, the parent or
caretaker relative of the family shall consent to, and shall cooperate with, the department in
establishing paternity, and in establishing and/or enforcing child support and medical support
orders for any children in the family receiving appropriate child care under this section in
accordance with the applicable sections of title 15, as amended, unless the parent or caretaker
relative is found to have good cause for refusing to comply with the requirements of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this section, "appropriate childcare" means childcare, including infant,
toddler, preschool, nursery school, and school age, that is provided by a person or organization
qualified, approved, and authorized to provide the care by the state agency or agencies designated
to make the determinations in accordance with the provisions set forth in this section.
(f)(1) Families with incomes at or below one hundred percent (100%) of the applicable
federal poverty level guidelines shall be provided with free childcare. Families with incomes
greater than one hundred percent (100%) of the applicable federal poverty guideline shall be
required to pay for some portion of the childcare they receive, according to a sliding-fee scale
LC004394 - Page 3 of 13

adopted by the department in the department's rules, not to exceed seven percent (7%) of income
as defined in subsection (h) of this section.
(2) Families who are receiving childcare assistance and who become ineligible for
childcare assistance as a result of their incomes exceeding eighty-five percent (85%) of state
median income shall continue to be eligible for childcare assistance until their incomes exceed one
hundred percent (100%) of the state median income. To be eligible, the families must continue to
pay for some portion of the childcare they receive, as indicated in a sliding-fee scale adopted in the
department's rules, not to exceed seven percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this
section, and in accordance with other eligibility standards.
(g) In determining the type of childcare to be provided to a family, the department shall
take into account the cost of available childcare options, the suitability of the type of care available
for the child; and the parent's preference as to the type of childcare.
(h) For purposes of this section, “income” for families receiving cash assistance under §§
40-5.2-10(g)(2) and 40-5.2-10(g)(3), and income for other families shall mean gross, earned, and
unearned income as determined by departmental regulations.
(i) The caseload estimating conference established by chapter 17 of title 35 shall forecast
the expenditures for childcare in accordance with the provisions of § 35-17-1.
(j) In determining eligibility for childcare assistance for children of members of reserve
components called to active duty during a time of conflict, the department shall freeze the family
composition and the family income of the reserve component member as it was in the month prior
to the month of leaving for active duty. This freeze shall continue until the individual is officially
discharged from active duty.
(k) Effective from August 1, 2026, through July 31, 2028, the department shall provide
funding for childcare for eligible childcare educators, and childcare staff, who work at least twenty
(20) hours a week in licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare homes as defined in
the department’s rules and regulations. Eligibility is limited to qualifying childcare educators and
childcare staff with family incomes up to three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal
poverty guidelines and will have no copayments. Qualifying participants may select the childcare
center or family childcare home for their children. The department shall promulgate regulations
necessary to implement this section and will collect applicant and participant data to report
estimated demand for state-funded childcare for eligible childcare educators and childcare staff.
The report shall be due annually to the governor and the general assembly by November 1.
40-6.7-2. Childcare assistance -- Rates established.
(a) Effective July 1, 2026, the rates to be paid by the department of human services and the
LC004394 - Page 4 of 13

department of children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers and family childcare
homes shall be updated to reflect findings from the 2024 Rhode Island childcare market rate survey
and shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has
achieved within the state's quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. All rates shall meet or
exceed the federal equal access benchmark (seventy-fifth percentile of the most recent Rhode Island
childcare market rate survey) and programs that have achieved a high-quality rating shall be paid
rates at or above the ninetieth percentile of the most recent Rhode Island childcare market rate
survey. Weekly rates shall be paid as follows:
LICENSED CHILDCARE CENTERS & FAMILY CHILDCARE HOMES
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant $463 $472 $482 $491 $501
Toddler $356 $363 $371 $378 $385
Preschool $312 $320 $329 $337 $345
School-Age $280 $287 $295 $303 $310
(b) By June 30, 2027, and triennially thereafter, the department of human services in
consultation with the department of labor and training shall conduct an independent survey or
certify an independent survey of the then-current weekly market rates for childcare in Rhode Island
and shall post the findings from the market rate survey on the department's public website. The
departments of human services and labor and training shall jointly determine the survey criteria
including, but not limited to, rate categories and sub-categories.
(c) In order to expand the accessibility and availability of quality childcare, the department
of human services is authorized to establish, by regulation, alternative or incentive rates for quality
enhancements, innovative or specialized childcare, and alternative methodologies of childcare
delivery, including nontraditional delivery systems and collaborations.
(d) All childcare providers have the option to be paid every two (2) weeks and have the
option of automatic direct deposit and/or electronic funds transfer of payments.
SECTION 3. Section 40-5.2-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-5.2 entitled "The Rhode
Island Works Program" is hereby repealed.
40-5.2-20. Childcare assistance — Families or assistance units eligible.
(a) The department shall provide appropriate child care to every participant who is eligible
for cash assistance and who requires child care in order to meet the work requirements in
accordance with this chapter.
(b) Low-income child care. The department shall provide child care to all other working
families with incomes at or below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal poverty
LC004394 - Page 5 of 13

level if, and to the extent, these other families require child care in order to work at paid
employment as defined in the department’s rules and regulations. The department shall also provide
child care to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the federal
poverty level if, and to the extent, these families require child care to participate on a short-term
basis, as defined in the department’s rules and regulations, in training, apprenticeship, internship,
on-the-job training, work experience, work immersion, or other job-readiness/job-attachment
program sponsored or funded by the human resource investment council (governor’s workforce
board) or state agencies that are part of the coordinated program system pursuant to § 42-102-11.
Effective from January 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, the department shall also provide childcare
assistance to families with incomes below one hundred eighty percent (180%) of the federal poverty
level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain
enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education provided that eligibility to
receive funding is capped when expenditures reach $200,000 for this provision. Effective July 1,
2022 through December 31, 2024, the department shall also provide childcare assistance to families
with incomes below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level when such assistance
is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island
public institution of higher education. Effective January 1, 2025, the department shall also provide
childcare assistance to families with incomes below two hundred sixty-one percent (261%) of the
federal poverty level when such assistance is necessary for a member of these families to enroll or
maintain enrollment in a Rhode Island public institution of higher education.
(c) No family/assistance unit shall be eligible for childcare assistance under this chapter if
the combined value of its liquid resources exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000), which
corresponds to the amount permitted by the federal government under the state plan and set forth
in the administrative rulemaking process by the department. Liquid resources are defined as any
interest(s) in property in the form of cash or other financial instruments or accounts that are readily
convertible to cash or cash equivalents. These include, but are not limited to: cash, bank, credit
union, or other financial institution savings, checking, and money market accounts; certificates of
deposit or other time deposits; stocks; bonds; mutual funds; and other similar financial instruments
or accounts. These do not include educational savings accounts, plans, or programs; retirement
accounts, plans, or programs; or accounts held jointly with another adult, not including a spouse.
The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to determine the ownership and
source of the funds in the joint account.
(d) As a condition of eligibility for childcare assistance under this chapter, the parent or
caretaker relative of the family must consent to, and must cooperate with, the department in
LC004394 - Page 6 of 13

establishing paternity, and in establishing and/or enforcing child support and medical support
orders for any children in the family receiving appropriate child care under this section in
accordance with the applicable sections of title 15, as amended, unless the parent or caretaker
relative is found to have good cause for refusing to comply with the requirements of this subsection.
(e) For purposes of this section, “appropriate child care” means child care, including infant,
toddler, preschool, nursery school, and school-age, that is provided by a person or organization
qualified, approved, and authorized to provide the care by the state agency or agencies designated
to make the determinations in accordance with the provisions set forth herein.
(f)(1) Families with incomes below one hundred percent (100%) of the applicable federal
poverty level guidelines shall be provided with free child care. Families with incomes greater than
one hundred percent (100%) and less than two hundred percent (200%) of the applicable federal
poverty guideline shall be required to pay for some portion of the child care they receive, according
to a sliding-fee scale adopted by the department in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven
percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section.
(2) Families who are receiving childcare assistance and who become ineligible for
childcare assistance as a result of their incomes exceeding two hundred sixty-one percent (261%)
of the applicable federal poverty guidelines shall continue to be eligible for childcare assistance
until their incomes exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal poverty
guidelines. To be eligible, the families must continue to pay for some portion of the child care they
receive, as indicated in a sliding-fee scale adopted in the department’s rules, not to exceed seven
percent (7%) of income as defined in subsection (h) of this section, and in accordance with all other
eligibility standards.
(g) In determining the type of child care to be provided to a family, the department shall
take into account the cost of available childcare options; the suitability of the type of care available
for the child; and the parent’s preference as to the type of child care.
(h) For purposes of this section, “income” for families receiving cash assistance under §
40-5.2-11 means gross, earned income and unearned income, subject to the income exclusions in
§§ 40-5.2-10(g)(2) and 40-5.2-10(g)(3), and income for other families shall mean gross, earned and
unearned income as determined by departmental regulations.
(i) The caseload estimating conference established by chapter 17 of title 35 shall forecast
the expenditures for child care in accordance with the provisions of § 35-17-1.
(j) In determining eligibility for childcare assistance for children of members of reserve
components called to active duty during a time of conflict, the department shall freeze the family
composition and the family income of the reserve component member as it was in the month prior
LC004394 - Page 7 of 13

to the month of leaving for active duty. This shall continue until the individual is officially
discharged from active duty.
(k) Effective from August 1, 2023, through July 31, 2028, the department shall provide
funding for child care for eligible childcare educators, and childcare staff, who work at least twenty
(20) hours a week in licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare homes as defined in
the department’s rules and regulations. Eligibility is limited to qualifying childcare educators and
childcare staff with family incomes up to three hundred percent (300%) of the applicable federal
poverty guidelines and will have no copayments. Qualifying participants may select the childcare
center or family childcare home for their children. The department shall promulgate regulations
necessary to implement this section, and will collect applicant and participant data to report
estimated demand for state-funded child care for eligible childcare educators and childcare staff.
The report shall be due annually to the governor and the general assembly by November 1.
SECTION 4. Section 40-6.2-1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-6.2 entitled "Child
Care — State Subsidies" is hereby repealed.
40-6.2-1.1. Rates established.
(a) Through June 30, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the
maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth
and families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based
on the following schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the
average of the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates:
Licensed Childcare Centers 75th Percentile of Weekly Market Rate
Infant $182.00
Preschool $150.00
School-Age $135.00
Licensed Family Childcare Providers 75th Percentile of Weekly Market Rate
Infant $150.00
Preschool $150.00
School-Age $135.00
Effective July 1, 2015, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the maximum
reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of human services and children, youth and
families for licensed childcare centers and licensed family childcare providers shall be based on the
above schedule of the 75th percentile of the 2002 weekly market rates adjusted for the average of
the 75th percentile of the 2002 and the 2004 weekly market rates. These rates shall be increased by
ten dollars ($10.00) per week for infant/toddler care provided by licensed family childcare
LC004394 - Page 8 of 13

providers and license-exempt providers and then the rates for all providers for all age groups shall
be increased by three percent (3%). For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2018, licensed childcare
centers shall be reimbursed a maximum weekly rate of one hundred ninety-three dollars and sixty-
four cents ($193.64) for infant/toddler care and one hundred sixty-one dollars and seventy-one
cents ($161.71) for preschool-age children.
(b) Effective July l, 2018, subject to the payment limitations in subsection (c), the
maximum infant/toddler and preschool-age reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments of
human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1.
(1) For infant/toddler child care, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half percent
(2.5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above
the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY
2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed twenty percent (20%) above the FY 2018 weekly
amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed thirty-three percent (33%) above the FY 2018 weekly
amount.
(2) For preschool reimbursement rates, tier one shall be reimbursed two and one-half
percent (2.5%) above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%)
above the FY 2018 weekly amount, tier three shall be reimbursed ten percent (10%) above the FY
2018 weekly amount, tier four shall be reimbursed thirteen percent (13%) above the FY 2018
weekly amount, and tier five shall be reimbursed twenty-one percent (21%) above the FY 2018
weekly amount.
(c) [Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 13, § 4.]
(d) By June 30, 2004, and biennially through June 30, 2014, the department of labor and
training shall conduct an independent survey or certify an independent survey of the then-current
weekly market rates for child care in Rhode Island and shall forward the weekly market rate survey
to the department of human services. The next survey shall be conducted by June 30, 2016, and
triennially thereafter. The departments of human services and labor and training will jointly
determine the survey criteria including, but not limited to, rate categories and sub-categories.
(e) In order to expand the accessibility and availability of quality child care, the department
of human services is authorized to establish, by regulation, alternative or incentive rates of
reimbursement for quality enhancements, innovative or specialized child care, and alternative
methodologies of childcare delivery, including nontraditional delivery systems and collaborations.
(f) Effective January 1, 2007, all childcare providers have the option to be paid every two
LC004394 - Page 9 of 13

(2) weeks and have the option of automatic direct deposit and/or electronic funds transfer of
reimbursement payments.
(g) Effective July 1, 2019, the maximum infant/toddler reimbursement rates to be paid by
the departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed family childcare
providers shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has
achieved within the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Tier one shall be
reimbursed two percent (2%) above the prevailing base rate for step 1 and step 2 providers, three
percent (3%) above prevailing base rate for step 3 providers, and four percent (4%) above the
prevailing base rate for step 4 providers; tier two shall be reimbursed five percent (5%) above the
prevailing base rate; tier three shall be reimbursed eleven percent (11%) above the prevailing base
rate; tier four shall be reimbursed fourteen percent (14%) above the prevailing base rate; and tier
five shall be reimbursed twenty-three percent (23%) above the prevailing base rate.
(h) Through December 31, 2021, the maximum reimbursement rates paid by the
departments of human services, and children, youth and families to licensed childcare centers shall
be consistent with the enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant/Toddler $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $257.54 $273.00
Preschool Age $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $195.67 $260.00
School Age $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $200.00 $245.00
The maximum reimbursement rates paid by the departments of human services, and
children, youth and families to licensed family childcare providers shall be consistent with the
enhanced emergency rates provided as of June 1, 2021, as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant/Toddler $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43 $224.43
Preschool Age $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45 $171.45
School Age $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30 $162.30
(i) Effective January 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the
departments of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers
shall be implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved
within the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $236.36 $244.88 $257.15 $268.74 $284.39
LC004394 - Page 10 of 13

Preschool $207.51 $212.27 $218.45 $223.50 $231.39
School-Age $180.38 $182.77 $185.17 $187.57 $189.97
The maximum reimbursement rates for licensed family childcare providers paid by the
departments of human services, and children, youth and families is determined through collective
bargaining. The maximum reimbursement rates for infant/toddler and preschool age children paid
to licensed family childcare providers by both departments is implemented in a tiered manner that
reflects the quality rating the provider has achieved in accordance with § 42-12-23.1.
(j) Effective July 1, 2022, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $265 $270 $282 $289 $300
Preschool $225 $235 $243 $250 $260
School-Age $200 $205 $220 $238 $250
(k) Effective July 1, 2024, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Licensed Childcare Centers
Tier One Tier Two Tier Three Tier Four Tier Five
Infant/Toddler $278 $284 $296 $303 $315
Preschool $236 $247 $255 $263 $273
School-Age $210 $215 $231 $250 $263
(l) Effective July 1, 2025, the maximum reimbursement rates to be paid by the departments
of human services and children, youth and families for licensed childcare centers shall be
implemented in a tiered manner, reflective of the quality rating the provider has achieved within
the state’s quality rating system outlined in § 42-12-23.1. Maximum weekly rates shall be
reimbursed as follows:
Tier 1 Tier 2 Tier 3 Tier 4 Tier 5
Infant $334 $341 $355 $364 $378
Toddlers $278 $284 $296 $303 $315
Preschoolers $236 $247 $255 $263 $273
LC004394 - Page 11 of 13

School Age $210 $215 $231 $250 $263
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC004394
========
LC004394 - Page 12 of 13